New York, session 2025-2026, S4726.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 87 of the public officers law, as 2 added by chapter 302 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 6. [All agencies subject to the requirements of this article shall 4 develop a policy regarding providing a notification to public employees 5 in the event that the agency is responding to a request for such employ- 6 ee's disciplinary records] (a) Every agency or public employer shall 7 provide written notification to an employee that a request for informa- 8 tion pursuant to the provisions of this article seeking such employee's 9 personnel records has been approved. The notification shall list any 10 documents requested, provided, or copied for dissemination or public 11 inspection. 12 (b) Upon official notification from the employer that a request for 13 information pursuant to the provisions of this article seeking such 14 employee's personnel records has been approved, such employee shall be 15 given the ability to inspect their personnel file or any other document 16 referencing the employee as part of the information request. This 17 section shall not be a restriction to an employee's right to inspect 18 their personnel file pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, or 19 other law. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09569-01-5